src-fst-morphology-stems-abbreviations.lexc.md
# File containing abbreviations

Lexica for adding tags and periods

Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor

* **LEXICON Abbreviation   **

* **LEXICON trab-ab-noun   **
* **LEXICON trab-ab-adj   **
* **LEXICON trab-ab-adv   **
* **LEXICON trab-ab-verb   **
* **LEXICON trab-ab-num   **
* **LEXICON trab-ab-cc   **

* **LEXICON itrab-ab-noun   **
* **LEXICON itrab-ab-adj   **
* **LEXICON itrab-ab-adv   **
* **LEXICON itrab-ab-num   **

* **LEXICON trnumab-ab-noun   **
* **LEXICON trnumab-ab-adj   **

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   **   The bulk
Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   **

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   **

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-num   **

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-cc   **

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   **

## Intransitive abbreviations 

* **LEXICON ITRAB   **

* **LEXICON TRNUMAB   **

## Transitive abbreviations 

* **LEXICON TRAB   **

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sje/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc)</small>

---
